src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Num_fulltenths_20_90_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Numeral - kyehtlov:
    kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Nom: kyehtlov
    kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Gen: kyevtlov
    kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Acc: kyehtlov
    kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Ill: kyevtlohán
    kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Loc: kyevtlovveest
    kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Com: kuovttijnluvvijn
    kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Abe: kyevtlovettáá
    kyehtlov+Num+Ess: kyehtinlovveen
    kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Nom: kyevtihloveh
    kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Gen: kuovtijluvij
    kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Acc: kuovtijdluuvijd
    kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Ill: kuovttijdluvvijd
    kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Loc: kuovttijnluvvijn
    kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Com: kuovtijluvijguin
    kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Abe: kuovtijluvijttáá

# kyehtlov as num attr.
# kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Nom: -
# kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Gen: kyevtlov kistuu
# kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Acc: - 
# kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Ill: kyevtlov kistui
# kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Loc: kyevtlov kistust
# kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Com: kuovttijnluvvijn kistuin
# kyehtlov+Num+Sg+Abe: kyevtlov kistuuttáá
# kyehtlov+Num+Ess: kyehtinlovveen kiistân
# kyehtlov+Num+Par: kyehtlov kiistâd
# kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Nom: kyevtihloveh kistuuh
# kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Gen: kuovtijluvij kistui
# kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Acc: kuovtijdluuvijd kistuid
# kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Ill: kuovttijdluvvijd kistuid
# kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Loc: kuovtijnluuvijn kistuin
# kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Com: kuovtijluvij kistuiguin
# kyehtlov+Num+Pl+Abe: kuovtijluvij kistuittáá


  Numeral - kulmâlov:
    kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Nom: kulmâlov
    kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Gen: kuulmâlov
    kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Acc: kulmâlov
    kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Ill: kuulmâlohán
    kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Loc: kuulmâlovveest
    kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Com: kulmáinluvvijn
    kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Abe: kuulmâlovettáá
    kulmâlov+Num+Ess: kulmânlovveen
    kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Nom: kuulmahloveh
    kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Gen: [kuulmâiluvij, kulmâiluvij]
    kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Acc: kuulmâidluuvijd
    kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Ill: kulmáidluvvijd
    kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Loc: kuulmâinluuvijn
    kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Com: kulmâiluvijguin 
    kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Abe: kulmâiluvijttáá

# kulmâlov as num attr.
# kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Nom: - (does not exist)
# kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Gen: kuulmâlov kistuu
# kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Acc: - (does not exist)
# kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Ill: kuulmâlov kistui
# kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Loc: kuulmâlov kistust
# kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Com: kulmáinluvvijn kistuin
# kulmâlov+Num+Sg+Abe: kuulmâlov kistuuttáá
# kulmâlov+Num+Ess: kulmânlovveen kiistân
# kulmâlov+Num+Par: kulmâlov kiistâd
# kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Nom: kuulmahloveh kistuuh
# kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Gen: kulmâiluvij kistui
# kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Acc: kuulmâidluuvijd kistuid
# kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Ill: kulmáidluvvijd kistuid
# kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Loc: kuulmâinluuvijn kistuin
# kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Com: kulmâiluvij kistuiguin
# kulmâlov+Num+Pl+Abe: kulmâiluvij kistuittáá

  Numeral - neljilov:
    neljilov+Num+Sg+Nom: neljilov
    neljilov+Num+Sg+Gen: neeljilov
    neljilov+Num+Sg+Acc: neljilov
    neljilov+Num+Sg+Ill: neeljilohán
    neljilov+Num+Sg+Loc: neeljilovveest
    neljilov+Num+Sg+Com: neljijnluvvijn
    neljilov+Num+Sg+Abe: neeljilovettáá
    neljilov+Num+Ess: neljinlovveen
    neljilov+Num+Pl+Nom: neeljihloveh
    neljilov+Num+Pl+Gen: [neeljijluvij, neljijluvij]
    neljilov+Num+Pl+Acc: neeljijdluuvijd
    neljilov+Num+Pl+Ill: neljijdluvvijd
    neljilov+Num+Pl+Loc: neeljijnluuvijn
    neljilov+Num+Pl+Com: neljijluvijguin 
    neljilov+Num+Pl+Abe: neljijluvijttáá

# neljilov as num attr.
# neljilov+Num+Sg+Nom: - (does not exist)
# neljilov+Num+Sg+Gen: neeljilov kistuu
# neljilov+Num+Sg+Acc: -
# neljilov+Num+Sg+Ill: neeljilov kistui
# neljilov+Num+Sg+Loc: neeljilov kistust
# neljilov+Num+Sg+Com: neljijnluvvijn kistuin
# neljilov+Num+Sg+Abe: neeljilov kistuuttáá
# neljilov+Num+Ess: neljinlovveen kiistân
# neljilov+Num+Par: neljilov kiistâd
# neljilov+Num+Pl+Nom: neeljihloveh kistuuh
# neljilov+Num+Pl+Gen: neljijluvij kistui
# neljilov+Num+Pl+Acc: neeljijdluuvijd kistuid
# neljilov+Num+Pl+Ill: neljijdluvvijd kistuid
# neljilov+Num+Pl+Loc: neeljijnluuvijn kistuin
# neljilov+Num+Pl+Com: neljijluvij kistuiguin
# neljilov+Num+Pl+Abe: neljijluvij kistuittáá

  Numeral - vittlov:
    vittlov+Num+Sg+Nom: [vitlov, vittlov]
    vittlov+Num+Sg+Gen: viđâlov
    vittlov+Num+Sg+Acc: [vitlov, vittlov]
    vittlov+Num+Sg+Ill: viđâlohán
    vittlov+Num+Sg+Loc: viđâlovveest
    vittlov+Num+Sg+Com: viiđáinluvvijn
    vittlov+Num+Sg+Abe: viđâlovettáá
    vittlov+Num+Ess: vittânlovveen
    vittlov+Num+Pl+Nom: viiđahloveh
    vittlov+Num+Pl+Gen: viđâiluvij
    vittlov+Num+Pl+Acc: viiđâidluuvijd
    vittlov+Num+Pl+Ill: viiđáidluvvijd
    vittlov+Num+Pl+Loc: viiđâinluuvijn
    vittlov+Num+Pl+Com: viđâiluvijguin 
    vittlov+Num+Pl+Abe: viđâiluvijttáá

# vitlov as num attr.
# vitlov+Num+Sg+Nom: - (does not exist)
# vitlov+Num+Sg+Gen: viđâlov kistuu
# vitlov+Num+Sg+Acc: -
# vitlov+Num+Sg+Ill: viđâlov kistui
# vitlov+Num+Sg+Loc: viđâlov kistust
# vitlov+Num+Sg+Com: viiđáinluvvijn kistuin
# vitlov+Num+Sg+Abe: viđâlov kistuuttáá
# vitlov+Num+Ess: vittânlovveen kiistân
# vitlov+Num+Par: vitlov kiistâd
# vitlov+Num+Pl+Nom: viiđahloveh kistuuh
# vitlov+Num+Pl+Gen: viđâiluvij kistui
# vitlov+Num+Pl+Acc: viiđâidluuvijd kistuid
# vitlov+Num+Pl+Ill: viđâidluvvijd kistuid
# vitlov+Num+Pl+Loc: viiđâinluuvijn kistuin
# vitlov+Num+Pl+Com: viđâiluvij kistuiguin
# vitlov+Num+Pl+Abe: viđâiluvij kistuittáá

  Numeral - kutlov:
    kuttlov+Num+Sg+Nom: [kutlov, kuttlov]
    kuttlov+Num+Sg+Gen: kuđâlov
    kuttlov+Num+Sg+Acc: [kutlov, kuttlov]
    kuttlov+Num+Sg+Ill: kuđâlohán
    kuttlov+Num+Sg+Loc: kuđâlovveest
    kuttlov+Num+Sg+Com: kuuđáinluvvijn
    kuttlov+Num+Sg+Abe: kuđâlovettáá
    kuttlov+Num+Ess: kuttânlovveen
    kuttlov+Num+Pl+Nom: kuuđahloveh
    kuttlov+Num+Pl+Gen: kuđâiluvij
    kuttlov+Num+Pl+Acc: kuuđâidluuvijd
    kuttlov+Num+Pl+Ill: kuuđáidluvvijd
    kuttlov+Num+Pl+Loc: kuuđâinluuvijn
    kuttlov+Num+Pl+Com: kuđâiluvijguin 
    kuttlov+Num+Pl+Abe: kuđâiluvijttáá

# kutlov as num attr.
# kutlov+Num+Sg+Nom: - (does not exist)
# kutlov+Num+Sg+Gen: kuđâlov kistuu
# kutlov+Num+Sg+Acc: -
# kutlov+Num+Sg+Ill: kuđâlov kistui
# kutlov+Num+Sg+Loc: kuđâlov kistust
# kutlov+Num+Sg+Com: kuuđáinluvvijn kistuin
# kutlov+Num+Sg+Abe: kuđâlov kistuuttáá
# kutlov+Num+Ess: kuttânlovveen kiistân
# kutlov+Num+Par: kutlov kiistâd
# kutlov+Num+Pl+Nom: kuuđahloveh kistuuh
# kutlov+Num+Pl+Gen: kuđâiluvij kistui
# kutlov+Num+Pl+Acc: kuuđâidluuvijd kistuid
# kutlov+Num+Pl+Ill: kuđâidluvvijd kistuid
# kutlov+Num+Pl+Loc: kuuđâinluuvijn kistuin
# kutlov+Num+Pl+Com: kuđâiluvij kistuiguin
# kutlov+Num+Pl+Abe: kuđâiluvij kistuittáá

  Numeral - čiččâmlov:
    čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Nom: čiččâmlov
    čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Gen: čiččâmlov
    čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Acc: čiččâmlov
    čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Ill: čiččâmlohán
    čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Loc: čiččâmlovveest
    čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Com: čiččâmáinluvvijn
    čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Abe: čiččâmlovettáá
    čiččâmlov+Num+Ess: čiččâmlovveen
    čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Nom: čiččâmehloveh
    čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Gen: čiččâmijluvij
    čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Acc: čiččâmijdluuvijd
    čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Ill: čiččâmáidluvvijd
    čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Loc: čiččâmijnluuvijn
    čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Com: čiččâmijluvijguin 
    čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Abe: čiččâmijluvijttáá

# čiččâmlov as num attr.
# čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Nom: - (does not exist)
# čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Gen: čiččâmlov kistuu
# čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Acc: -
# čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Ill: čiččâmlov kistui
# čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Loc: čiččâmlov kistust
# čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Com: čiččâmáinluvvijn kistuin
# čiččâmlov+Num+Sg+Abe: čiččâmlov kistuuttáá
# čiččâmlov+Num+Ess: čiččâmlovveen kiistân
# čiččâmlov+Num+Par: čiččâmlov kiistâd
# čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Nom: čiččâmehloveh kistuuh
# čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Gen: čiččâmijluvij kistui
# čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Acc: čiččâmijdluuvijd kistuid
# čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Ill: čiččâmáidluvvijd kistuid
# čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Loc: čiččâmijnluuvijn kistuin
# čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Com: čiččâmijluvij kistuiguin
# čiččâmlov+Num+Pl+Abe: čiččâmijluvij kistuittáá

  Numeral - kähcilov:
    kähcilov+Num+Sg+Nom: kähcilov
    kähcilov+Num+Sg+Gen: käävcilov
    kähcilov+Num+Sg+Acc: kähcilov
    kähcilov+Num+Sg+Ill: [kävcilohán, käävcilohán]
    kähcilov+Num+Sg+Loc: [kävcilovveest, käävcilovveest]
    kähcilov+Num+Sg+Com: kavccijnluvvijn
    kähcilov+Num+Sg+Abe: kävcilovettáá
    kähcilov+Num+Ess: kähcilovveen
    kähcilov+Num+Pl+Nom: käävcihloveh
    kähcilov+Num+Pl+Gen: kavcijluvij
    kähcilov+Num+Pl+Acc: kaavcijdluuvijd
    kähcilov+Num+Pl+Ill: kavccijdluvvijd
    kähcilov+Num+Pl+Loc: kaavcijnluuvijn
    kähcilov+Num+Pl+Com: kavcijluvijguin 
    kähcilov+Num+Pl+Abe: kavcijluvijttáá

# kähcilov as num attr.
# kähcilov+Num+Sg+Nom: - (does not exist)
# kähcilov+Num+Sg+Gen: käävcilov kistuu
# kähcilov+Num+Sg+Acc: -
# kähcilov+Num+Sg+Ill: käävcilov kistui
# kähcilov+Num+Sg+Loc: käävcilov kistust
# kähcilov+Num+Sg+Com: kavccijnluvvijn kistuin
# kähcilov+Num+Sg+Abe: käävcilov kistuuttáá
# kähcilov+Num+Ess: kähcilovveen kiistân
# kähcilov+Num+Par: kähcilov kiistâd
# kähcilov+Num+Pl+Nom: käävcihloveh kistuuh
# kähcilov+Num+Pl+Gen: kaavcijluvij kistui
# kähcilov+Num+Pl+Acc: kaavcijdluuvijd kistuid
# kähcilov+Num+Pl+Ill: kavccijdluvvijd kistuid
# kähcilov+Num+Pl+Loc: kaavcijnluuvijn kistuin
# kähcilov+Num+Pl+Com: kavcijluvij kistuiguin
# kähcilov+Num+Pl+Abe: kavcijluvij kistuittáá

  Numeral - ohcelov:
    ohcelov+Num+Sg+Nom: ohcelov
    ohcelov+Num+Sg+Gen: oovcelov
    ohcelov+Num+Sg+Acc: ohcelov
    ohcelov+Num+Sg+Ill: [oovcelohán, ovcelohán]
    ohcelov+Num+Sg+Loc: [oovcelovveest, ovcelovveest]
    ohcelov+Num+Sg+Com: ovccijnluvvijn
    ohcelov+Num+Sg+Abe: ovcelovettáá
    ohcelov+Num+Ess: ohcelovveen
    ohcelov+Num+Pl+Nom: oovcehloveh
    ohcelov+Num+Pl+Gen: ovcijluvij
    ohcelov+Num+Pl+Acc: oovcijdluuvijd
    ohcelov+Num+Pl+Ill: ovccijdluvvijd
    ohcelov+Num+Pl+Loc: oovcijnluuvijn
    ohcelov+Num+Pl+Com: ovcijluvijguin 
    ohcelov+Num+Pl+Abe: ovcijluvijttáá

# ohcelov as num attr.
# ohcelov+Num+Sg+Nom: - (does not exist)
# ohcelov+Num+Sg+Gen: oovcelov kistuu
# ohcelov+Num+Sg+Acc: -
# ohcelov+Num+Sg+Ill: oovcelov kistui
# ohcelov+Num+Sg+Loc: oovcelov kistust
# ohcelov+Num+Sg+Com: ovccijnluvvijn kistuin
# ohcelov+Num+Sg+Abe: oovcelov kistuuttáá
# ohcelov+Num+Ess: ohcelovveen kiistân
# ohcelov+Num+Par: ohcelov kiistâd
# ohcelov+Num+Pl+Nom: oovcehloveh kistuuh
# ohcelov+Num+Pl+Gen: ovcijluvij kistui
# ohcelov+Num+Pl+Acc: oovcijdluuvijd kistuid
# ohcelov+Num+Pl+Ill: ovccijdluvvijd kistuid
# ohcelov+Num+Pl+Loc: oovcijnluuvijn kistuin
# ohcelov+Num+Pl+Com: ovcijluvij kistuiguin
# ohcelov+Num+Pl+Abe: ovcijluvij kistuittáá
